Washington statutes.
RCW 18.290.090

Reciprocity.

An applicant holding a license in another state may be licensed to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the licensing standards of the other state are substantially equivalent to the licensing standards of this state.

[ 2009 c 302 s 10.]